nb: Gjengestørrelse for stabilisator: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Annet
vi: Kích thước sợi ổn định: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Khác
ro-RO: Dimensiune a filetului stabilizatorului: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Altele
sk-SK: Veľkosť závitu stabilizátora: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Iné
de: Gewindegröße des Stabilisators: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Sonstige
nl: Stabilisator draadmaat: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Overige
cs: Velikost závitu stabilizátoru: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Jiné
da: Gevindstørrelse til stabilisator: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Andet
bg-BG: Размер на резбата на стабилизатора: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Друго
en: Stabilizer thread size: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Other
tr: Stabilizatör diş ölçüsü: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Diğer
ru: Размер резьбы стабилизатора: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Другое
ko: 안정기 나사산 사이즈: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; 기타
pl: Rozmiar gwintu stabilizatora: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Inne
es: Tamaño de hilo del estabilizador: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Otro
pt-PT: Tamanho da rosca do estabilizador: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Outro
lt-LT: Stabilizatoriaus sriegio dydis: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Kita
hr-HR: Stabilizator niz poruka veličina: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Ostalo
el: Μέγεθος σπειρώματος σταθεροποιητή: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Άλλο
pt-BR: Estabilizador tamanho da rosca: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Outro
zh-TW: 穩定器螺紋尺寸: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; 其他
ja: スタビライザースレッドサイズ: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; その他
hu: Stabilizátor menetének mérete: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Egyéb
th: โคลง ขนาด: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; อื่นๆ
fi: Jousen vakaajan kierrekoko: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Muu
sl-SI: Velikost navoja stabilizatorja: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Drugo
it: Misura della filettatura dello stabilizzatore: 1/4”-20; 3/8”-16; 5/16”-24; M6; M8; Altro
sv: Gängstorlek för stabilisator: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Övrigt
fr: Taille du filetage du stabilisateur: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; Autre
zh-CN: 平衡杆螺纹尺寸: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/16"-24; M6; M8; 其他